Utah statutes.
19-2-101.   Short title -- Policy of state and purpose of chapter -- Support
of local and regional programs -- Provision of coordinated statewide program.
(1)  This chapter is known as the "Air Conservation Act."
(2)  It is the policy of this state and the purpose of this chapter to achieve
and maintain levels of air quality which will protect human health and safety,
and to the greatest degree practicable, prevent injury to plant and animal
life and property, foster the comfort and convenience of the people, promote
the economic and social development of this state, and facilitate the
enjoyment of the natural attractions of this state.
(3)  Local and regional air pollution control programs shall be supported to
the extent practicable as essential instruments to secure and maintain
appropriate levels of air quality.
(4)  The purpose of this chapter is to:
(a)  provide for a coordinated statewide program of air pollution prevention,
abatement, and control;
(b)  provide for an appropriate distribution of responsibilities among the
state and local units of government;
(c)  facilitate cooperation across jurisdictional lines in dealing with
problems of air pollution not confined within single jurisdictions; and
(d)  provide a framework within which air quality may be protected and
consideration given to the public interest at all levels of planning and
development within the state.
